District of Columbia statutes.
26-906

Complaints; investigation; suspension, revocation, or denial of license.

Any complaint against a licensee or applicant shall be made in writing to the Mayor and the Mayor, on the basis of a written complaint or his or her initiative, may conduct an investigation. Pursuant to the investigation, the Mayor may suspend, revoke, or deny a license to any applicant or licensee who violates the provisions of this chapter. Before suspending, revoking, or denying a license, the Mayor shall notify the applicant or licensee of his or her right to a hearing pursuant to § 2-509.

Feb. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 659, ch. 26, § 6
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-188, § 2(b), 33 DCR 7687
1973 Ed., § 26-606.
1981 Ed., § 26-706.